test/src/morphology/A-suur_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - sūr: # adjectives 222 'eng /est suur/fin' - full paradigm
     sūr+A+Sg+Nom: sūr
     sūr+A+Sg+Gen: sūr
     sūr+A+Sg+Par: sūrtõ
     sūr+A+Sg+Dat: sūrõn
     sūr+A+Sg+Ins: sūrõks
     sūr+A+Sg+Ill: sūrõ
     sūr+A+Sg+Ela: sūrstõ
     sūr+A+Pl+Nom: sūrd
     sūr+A+Pl+Gen: sūrd
     sūr+A+Pl+Par: sūri
     sūr+A+Pl+Dat: sūrdõn
     sūr+A+Pl+Ins: sūrdkõks
     sūr+A+Pl+Ill: sūriž
     sūr+A+Pl+Ela: sūršti
